Washington statutes.
RCW 39.90.030

Validation of proceedings to finance or aid in financing.

All proceedings which have been taken prior to March 19, 1947, for the purpose of financing or aiding in the financing of any work, undertaking, or project by any public body, including all proceedings for the authorization and issuance of bonds and for the sale, execution, and delivery thereof, are hereby validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed, notwithstanding any lack of power (other than constitutional) of such public body, or the governing body or commission or officers thereof, to authorize and issue such bonds, or to sell, execute, or deliver the same, and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities (other than constitutional) in such proceedings.

[ 1947 c 242 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 5616-22.]